Utah statutes.
41-1a-227.   Campers -- Registration and display of decal -- Nonresident exceptions.

A person may not operate a vehicle with a camper mounted on it in this state unless:

(1)  the camper is currently registered and the appropriate decal, obtained under Section 59-2-330, is attached in plain sight to the rear of the camper; or

(2)  the vehicle is currently registered and licensed in another state with an out-of-state camper mounted on it.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

